Hawaii, session 2025, HB742.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a) The Hawaii community development authority shall prepare environmental impact statements pursuant to chapter 343, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for the following transit-oriented development infrastructure improvement districts: (1)  The Iwilei/Kapalama district on the island of Oahu; and (2)  The university of Hawaii west Oahu district on the island of Oahu. (b)  In addition to the requirements set forth in chapter 343, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the environmental impact statements prepared pursuant to subsection (a) shall analyze the effects of: (1)  Any necessary infrastructure improvements to each transit-oriented development infrastructure improvement district identified in sections (a)(1) and (2); and (2)  Building to the maximum extent of the entire zoned capacity of each transit-oriented development infrastructure improvement district identified in sections (a)(1) and (2). (c)  As used in this section: "Environmental impact statement" has the same meaning as in section 343-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes. "Transit-oriented development infrastructure improvement district" has the same meaning as in section 206E-242, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 2.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________